Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 45. Grading, Packing, and Marking of Apples.

§ 3.2-4500.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Container”
means any closed package of any description that is used to contain apples and includes boxes, baskets, and bags of any size or material.

“Packer”
means any person who first packs apples in a container for shipment or sale.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-512.1; 1954, c. 697; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-611; 1999, c. 793; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to controlled atmosphere storage of apples and peaches, see §

3.2-4600

et seq.

§ 3.2-4501.
Grades and standards.

The Board shall establish and adopt official grades and standards for apples by which the quality, quantity and size of the apples may be determined. Before establishing such official grades and standards, the Board shall consult with the Board of Directors of the Virginia Horticultural Society and the Board of Directors of the Virginia Apple Growers Association.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-512.5; 1954, c. 697; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-615; 1999, c. 793; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4502.
Marking containers; contents to conform to markings.

It is unlawful for apples, except apples delivered for processing or packing or delivered to storage for packing, to be sold, packed for sale, offered for sale or transported for sale, in containers, unless:

Each such container bears conspicuously in plain words and figures on the outside, or on a durable stuffer within and readily readable from the outside, showing the correct size, minimum quantity and correct variety of the apples in the container, one of the official grades and one of the official standards for apples established by the Board under this chapter, and the name and address of the producer’s or packer’s business; and

The apples in each container conform to the markings appearing on the container.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-512.2; 1954, c. 697; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-612; 1999, c. 793; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4503.
Packing in used containers.

When apples are packed in used containers, any markings pertaining to previous contents of such containers shall be obliterated by the producer or packer and the markings required under this chapter shall be substituted.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-512.3; 1954, c. 697; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-613; 1999, c. 793; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4504.
Prima facie evidence of being offered or transported for sale.

When containers of apples are placed in transit for sale or delivery or delivered for storage, such transit or delivery shall be prima facie evidence that the apples are offered or transported for sale.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-512.4; 1954, c. 697; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-614; 1999, c. 793; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4505.
Enforcement of chapter.

The Commissioner may:

Enter and inspect all places within the Commonwealth where apples are produced, packed or stored for sale, shipped, delivered for shipment, offered or exposed for sale, or sold, and to inspect all apples, containers and equipment found in any such places.

Institute injunction proceedings for violations of any provision of this chapter or regulation adopted hereunder in any circuit court in any county or city of the Commonwealth where apples may be found improperly marked in violation of any provision of this chapter, either through the attorney for the Commonwealth or otherwise.

Prohibit in writing the movement in intrastate, interstate or foreign commerce of any apples found improperly marked in violation of any provision of this chapter or regulation adopted hereunder until such apples are properly marked and released in writing by the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-512.6; 1954, c. 697; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-616; 1999, c. 793; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4506.
Penalty for violation.

Any person, except a contract or common carrier, who moves or causes to be moved any apples, the movement of which has been prohibited in writing as provided in §

3.2-4505

, is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-512.7; 1954, c. 697; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-617; 1999, c. 793; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.